Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1564.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 408.3(c)(3.1), (3.2)(ii), (4) and (8)(i) and (e) of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, are amended to read:Section 408.3. Copayments for Subsidized Child Care.--* * *(c) In establishing the copayment amounts pursuant to this section, all of the following shall apply:* * *(3.1) At initial application, the family's annual income may not exceed two hundred three percent of the Federal poverty income guidelines.(3.2) After an initial determination or redetermination of 1234567891011121314151617 eligibility, a child shall continue to be enrolled in subsidized child care for twelve months regardless of either of the following:* * *(ii) An increase in the family's annual income, if the income does not exceed [eighty-five] eighty-eight percent of the State median income for a family of the same size.(4) Subject to subsection (e), a family's annual copayment under either paragraph (1) or (2) shall not exceed:(i) eight percent of the family's annual income if the family's annual income is one hundred three percent of the Federal poverty income guideline or less;(ii) eleven percent of the family's annual income if the family's annual income exceeds one hundred three percent of the Federal poverty income guideline, but is not more than two hundred [fifty] fifty-three percent of the Federal poverty income guideline;(iii) thirteen percent of the family's annual income if the family's annual income exceeds two hundred [fifty] fifty-three percent of the Federal poverty income guideline, but is not more than two hundred [seventy-five] seventy-eight percent of the Federal poverty income guideline; or(iv) beginning after July 1, 2017, fifteen percent of the family's annual income if the family's annual income exceeds two hundred [seventy-five] seventy-eight percent of the Federal poverty income guideline, but is not more than three hundred five percent of the Federal poverty income guideline or [eighty-five] eighty-eight percent of the State median income, whichever is lower.* * *20250HB1564PN1915 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (8) A family that has previously qualified for a deduction in the child care copayment shall continue to remain eligible for the copayment deduction if:(i) the family's annual income does not exceed three hundred three percent of the Federal poverty income guideline or [eighty-five] eighty-eight percent of the State median income, whichever is lower;* * *(e) To the extent that money is appropriated for the purpose, the department shall increase eligibility under subsection (c)(4) for subsidized child care from two hundred [thirty-five] thirty-eight percent of the Federal poverty income guideline up to three hundred three percent of the Federal poverty income guideline and shall apply a copayment deduction under subsection (c)(6). The department shall not be required to maintain eligibility above two hundred [thirty-five] thirty-eight percent of the Federal poverty income guideline or apply a copayment deduction unless funding is appropriated by the General Assembly.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1564PN1915 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021